Washington statutes.
RCW 19.68.900

Construction—Application.

(1) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit or prohibit the donation of electronic health record technology or other activity by any entity, including a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW that operates a clinical laboratory, when the donation or other activity is allowed by or otherwise does not violate, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1320a-7b(b) or the federal rules adopted to implement 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1320a-7b(b).

(2) This section does not apply to any entity which principally operates as a clinical laboratory licensed or certified under section 353 of the public health service act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 263a, or other applicable Washington state law.

[ 2013 c 297 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2013 c 297: "(1) The legislature recognizes the complexity of the health care delivery system and the need to provide a clear and consistent regulatory framework to enable health care providers to manage their operations in an efficient and effective manner. The legislature also recognizes that the donation of electronic health records systems reduces health care costs, promotes patient safety, and improves the quality of health care.

(2) To further the important national policy of promoting the widespread adoption of electronic health records systems, the federal antikickback statute and the rules adopted to implement the statute contain a safe harbor that allows the donation of electronic health records systems. The federal statute and rules also contain additional safe harbors to preserve a variety of other activities which, in many cases, improve access to health care. For health care entities other than clinical laboratories, the legality of all of these arrangements is currently in question.

(3) The legislature is adding language to chapter 19.68 RCW to clarifying existing law and ensure that, except with respect to arrangements involving an entity which principally operates as a clinical laboratory, it is interpreted in a manner consistent with the federal antikickback statute." [ 2013 c 297 s 1.]

Retroactive application—2013 c 297: "This act applies retroactively to June 1, 2006, as well as prospectively." [ 2013 c 297 s 4.]